Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 3

Conscientious Objections to Provision of Counseling or Therapy Services

63-22-301. Part definitions.

For purposes of this part, “counseling or therapy services” means assisting an individual, who is seeking or engaged in the counseling relationship in a private practice setting, in a manner intended to facilitate normal human growth and development, using a combination of mental health and human development principles, methods, and techniques, to achieve mental, emotional, physical, social, moral, educational, spiritual, or career development and adjustment throughout the individual's life span.

Acts 2016, ch. 926, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 926, § 1 enacted this part with one section. By authority of the Code Commission, the section was codified as multiple sections. Subsection (c) was codified as § 63-22-301 and subsections (a), (b), and (d) were codified as § 63-22-302.

63-22-302. Conscientious objections — Referrals to other providers — Liability.

No counselor or therapist providing counseling or therapy services shall be required to counsel or serve a client as to goals, outcomes, or behaviors that conflict with the sincerely held principles of the counselor or therapist; provided, that the counselor or therapist coordinates a referral of the client to another counselor or therapist who will provide the counseling or therapy.

The refusal to provide counseling or therapy services as described in subsection (a) shall not be the basis for:

A civil cause of action; or

Criminal prosecution.

Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to a counselor or therapist when an individual seeking or undergoing counseling is in imminent danger of harming themselves or others.

Acts 2016, ch. 926, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 926, § 1 enacted this part with one section. By authority of the Code Commission, the section was codified as multiple sections. Subsection (c) was codified as § 63-22-301 and subsections (a), (b), and (d) were codified as § 63-22-302.

63-22-106. Marital and family therapists — Fees — Qualifications.